Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Librarians

171.230.
Application of KRS 171.240 to 171.306.

The provisions of KRS

171.240

to

171.306

shall apply to public libraries as defined in KRS

171.125

.

History.

4618-130f; amend. Acts 1972, ch. 223, § 2; 1990, ch. 62, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 65, § 4, effective June 26, 2007.

171.240.
Board for certification of librarians.

In the Department for Libraries and Archives there shall be a state board for the certification of librarians, composed of the state librarian and five (5) members appointed by the Governor from a list submitted by the board of directors of the Kentucky Library Association. Two (2) members shall be full-time professional librarians in active public library work, two (2) shall be public library trustees and one (1) shall be a professional librarian from a department or school of library science in a state university.

The term of office of each appointive member shall be four (4) years. The first appointive member of the board shall be appointed for terms beginning July 1, 1938; one (1) for a term of one (1) year; one (1) for a term of two (2) years; one (1) for a term of three (3) years; and two (2) for terms of four (4) years. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired terms in the same manner as original appointments are made. The members shall receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings.

The board shall hold at least one (1) meeting each year at a time fixed by the board, and such special meetings as may be determined by the board. A chairman and secretary shall be elected at each annual meeting to serve during the ensuing year.

History.

4618-130b; amend. Acts 1954, ch. 41, § 3; 1966, ch. 82, § 1; 1972, ch. 223, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1978, ch. 154, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 381, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 288, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

171.250.
Certificates of librarianship — To whom granted.

The board shall grant certificates of librarianship to applicants who are graduates of library schools approved by the board and shall grant certificates to other applicants when it has satisfied itself that the applicant is qualified for library work. Applicants shall provide such information as required by the board to determine their qualifications.

The board may issue renewals, determine the positions for which certificates of librarianship shall be required, and adopt rules and regulations for its own government and for carrying out the purposes of KRS

171.230

to

171.306

.

The board may issue certificates to qualified persons who are serving in libraries not supported from public funds.

Librarians who were in service on May 31, 1938, and served one (1) year prior to such date shall be entitled to receive a life certificate in accordance with their qualifications, without examination, upon the payment of prescribed fee.

History.

4618-130c, 4618-130d, 4618-130g; amend. Acts 1972, ch. 223, § 4; 1990, ch. 62, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 65, § 5, effective June 26, 2007.

171.260.
Certificate required.

No library coming under the provisions of KRS

171.230

to

171.306

shall have in its employ, in the position of librarian, or in any other full-time library service position, a person who does not hold an appropriate certificate of librarianship issued by the board.

History.

4618-130e; 1990, ch. 62, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 65, § 6, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Revolving, trust and agency funds, how created, KRS

45.253

.

171.270.
Fee for certificate.

The board shall require a fee of not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty dollars ($20) to be paid by each applicant for a librarian’s certificate.

History.

4618-130h; 2007, ch. 65, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

171.280.
Librarian’s certification fund.

The revolving fund established by the branch budget bill, consisting of all moneys collected under the provisions of KRS

171.230

to

171.306

shall be designated as the librarian’s certification fund. All money credited to the fund shall be used for the support of the Board for Certification of Librarians, and for the purposes of KRS

171.230

to

171.306

.

History.

4618-130j; amend. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 73, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 507, § 23, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 65, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

171.290.
Revocation of certificates — Notice.

In a proceeding to revoke a certificate of librarianship under the provisions of KRS 171.990(2), written notice of the proposed action shall be delivered in person, or forwarded by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the holder of the certificate at his last known post-office address, stating the cause for the contemplated action together with a copy of the charges and appointing a time and a place for the hearing by the board. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

4618-130K; amend. Acts 1974, ch. 315, § 20; 1980, ch. 114, § 28, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 57, effective July 15, 1996.

171.300.
Hearings to reconsider applications.

The board shall grant hearings, to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, for the purposes of reconsidering applications and awards if the applicant files with the board, within twenty (20) days of issuance of or refusal to issue a certificate, a petition for a hearing.

History.

4618-130L; 1996, ch. 318, § 58, effective July 15, 1996.

171.303.
Library science scholarships — Library Science Scholarship Fund Advisory Committee.

There is hereby established a Library Science Scholarship Fund.

The state librarian may grant scholarships for study in library science at an institution within the Commonwealth which is accredited by the American Library Association, the National Council for the Accreditation of Teacher Education or the appropriate regional postsecondary education accrediting organization. Scholarships may also be granted for study in an accredited library education program offered via distant learning technologies. Students applying for library education programs at institutions outside the Commonwealth that are likewise accredited may apply for assistance under this program if they agree to work in a library or archival services program within the Commonwealth upon their graduation in accordance with KRS

171.306

.

The state librarian shall establish a Library Science Scholarship Fund Advisory Committee that will receive and consider all applications for scholarships for study in library science and shall advise the state librarian on the awarding of scholarships according to criteria they establish for this purpose.

The department is authorized to receive money from any state, federal, private or other legal funding source approved by the appropriate state agency for scholarship purposes, and the amounts of individual scholarships shall be determined by the state librarian on the advice of the Library Science Scholarship Fund Advisory Committee, which shall set criteria for the assistance. Money designated for this fund shall be held in a restricted account and shall not lapse to the general fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 6; 1966, ch. 81, § 1; 2003, ch. 131, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

171.306.
Obligations of library science scholarship recipient.

To be eligible for a scholarship, an applicant shall contract in writing with the state librarian that he or she will graduate in an agreed to period of time and within six (6) months from the date of completing the program of study, accept employment with a library or archival services program approved by the state librarian for a period of at least two (2) years. The recipient shall agree to the terms of employment established by the employing library or archival services program.

If the recipient of a scholarship fails to fulfill the obligations agreed to under the contract for a scholarship the entire amount of scholarship benefits received shall become immediately due and payable to the Library Science Scholarship Fund. Repayment of benefits received under this program shall be due in a lump sum or through a payment schedule determined by the state librarian on the advice of the Library Science Scholarship Fund Advisory Committee, and in accordance with current interest rates applicable to similar debts collected by other financial assistance entities.

Upon recommendation of the state librarian, the Attorney General shall institute proceedings for the purpose of recovering any amount due the Commonwealth under the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 7; 1970, ch. 241, § 5; 2003, ch. 131, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section does not restrict the scholarship program to regional libraries and an applicant who contracts to accept employment with a library program approved by the State Librarian may fulfill the contract by accepting employment with any city, county or regional library whose library program is approved by the State Librarian.

OAG 67-236

.